Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.040

Interlibrary depository contracts—Repository of electronic publications.

(1) To provide economical public access to state publications, the center may enter into depository contracts with any free public library, The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state university library, or, if needed, the library of any privately incorporated college or university in this state. The requirements for eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by the secretary of state upon recommendations of the state librarian. The standards shall include and take into consideration the type of library, available housing and space for the publications, the number and qualifications of personnel, and availability for public use. The center may also contract with public, out-of-state libraries for the exchange of state and other publications on a reciprocal basis. Any state publication to be distributed to the public and the legislature shall be mailed at the lowest available postal rate.

(2) The office of the secretary of state through the state librarian shall preserve and make accessible state agency electronic publications deposited with the state library through an electronic repository.

[ 2006 c 199 s 6; 2002 c 342 s 6; 1981 c 260 s 8. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 96; 1963 c 233 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 199: See note following RCW 27.04.045.

Effective date—2002 c 342: See RCW 27.04.901.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.